Utah statutes.
7-1-713.   Conversion of financial institution -- Approval required --
Procedure -- Federal-state conversion.
(1)  Any financial institution authorized to do business as a particular class
of financial institution under any chapter of this title may convert to an
institution authorized to do business under another chapter by applying to the
department for approval in the manner provided in Section 7-1-706.
(2)  If the commissioner approves the conversion, the institution shall
immediately surrender its former charter to the commissioner. Under its new
charter as a financial institution of a different class, it is entitled to all
the benefits and powers conferred under the applicable chapter to other
financial institutions of that class and is subject to examination,
supervision, and regulation to the same extent as all other financial
institutions of that class.
(3)  Any depository institution organized under the laws of this state may
convert to a depository institution organized under the laws of the United
States upon compliance with the laws of the United States and upon surrender
of its charter to the commissioner.
(4)  Any depository institution organized under the laws of the United States
or any other state that is authorized to do business in this state may convert
into a depository institution subject to the jurisdiction of the department by
applying to the department for approval in the manner provided in Section
7-1-706.
